District of Columbia statutes.
16-101

Parties.

An action of account shall and may be brought against the executor and administrator of every guardian, bailiff and receiver; and by one joint-tenant and tenant in common, his executors and administrators, against the other, as bailiff for receiving more than comes to his just share or proportion, and against the executor and administrator of such a joint-tenant or tenant in common.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 537, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Cross References

Adoption subsidy payments, see § 4-301.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-101.
1973 Ed., § 16-101.

Editor's Notes

Section 28(a) of D.C. Law 15-354 provided that Title 16 is designated Title 16 of the District of Columbia Official Code.